Nebraska, session 109, LB80A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $20,000 from the Supreme Court
Automation Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $-0- from the Supreme Court
Automation Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Supreme Court, for Program 570, to
aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 80, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-